Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 22

Drug Court Treatment Act of 2003

16-22-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Drug Court Treatment Act of 2003.”

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 22, §§ 16-22-101 — 16-22-105 (Acts 1957, ch. 409, § 1; 1961, ch. 98, §§ 1-3; 1965, ch. 215, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 16-1001 — 16-1005), which created the position of cost accountant and budget officer in the judicial branch, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 21, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. If a probationer satisfied the requirements of participation in the “drug court program,” and participation in the program was ordered as a modification of the conditions of probation pursuant to a revocation hearing, then a drug court could assume jurisdiction over the probation by transfer of the probation to the drug court, OAG 03-164 (12/23/03).

As long as participation in the “drug court program” was ordered as a condition of the probation after a revocation hearing, defendant satisfied the criteria for participation in the program, and the case was one where the general sessions and circuit courts had concurrent jurisdiction, then a drug court would be able to accept a transfer of probation for a misdemeanant sentenced to probation in a general sessions court, OAG 03-164 (12/23/03).

As circuit courts are courts of general jurisdiction and maintain exclusive original jurisdiction over criminal matters, a circuit court or drug court created by a circuit court would have subject matter jurisdiction over any criminal case in that judicial district, OAG 03-164 (12/23/03).

Just as a sentence of probation may be transferred from one jurisdiction to another, there is nothing in the Tennessee code that would prevent a sentence of probation from being transferred from one division of a circuit court to another, OAG 03-164 (12/23/03).

Drug court treatment program participant facing sanctions, but not termination from program, for infractions—notice and hearing rights; recusal of judge. OAG 11-10, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/18/11).

Cited: State v. Stewart, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 691 (Tenn. Crim. App. Aug. 18, 2010).

16-22-102. Legislative intent — Goals.

The general assembly recognizes that a critical need exists in this state for criminal justice system programs to reduce the incidence of drug use, drug addiction and crimes committed as a result of drug use and drug addiction. It is the intent of the general assembly by this chapter to create a program to facilitate the implementation of new and the continuation of existing drug court treatment programs.

The goals of the drug court treatment programs created under this chapter include the following:

To reduce the use of jail and prison beds and other correctional services by nonviolent chemically dependent offenders by diverting them into rehabilitative programs;

To reduce incidences of drug use and drug addiction among offenders;

To reduce crimes committed as a result of drug use and addiction;

To promote public safety through these reductions;

To increase the personal, familial and societal accountability of offenders; and

To promote effective interaction and the use of resources among local criminal justice agencies and community agencies.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1.

16-22-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Chemically dependent” means a maladaptive pattern of substance use leading to clinically significant impairment or distress as manifested by two (2) or more of the pre-determinate symptoms occurring at any time in the same twelve-month period;

“Drug court treatment program” means any drug court treatment program created within the state that follows the general principles referenced in § 16-22-104 and that is established by the judge of a court in this state exercising criminal jurisdiction or by the judge of a juvenile court. A “drug court treatment program” shall have the same powers as the court that created it;

“Nonadversarial approach” means that the district attorney general and the defense attorney work together for the benefit of the drug court treatment program participants and the program. Any disagreements are to be resolved prior to court and not in front of the participants; and

“Violent offender” means a person who:

Is convicted of an offense, during the course of which:

The person carried, possessed or used a firearm or dangerous weapon;

There occurred the death of or serious bodily injury to any person; or

There occurred the use of force against the person of another; or

Has one (1) or more prior convictions for a felony crime of violence involving the use or attempted use of force against a person with the intent to cause death or serious bodily harm;

In determining whether a defendant is a “violent offender” under subdivision (4)(A)(i), it does not matter whether one (1) or more of the circumstances described in subdivision (4)(A)(i)(a ), (4)(A)(i)(b ), or (4)(A)(i)(c ) is or is not an element of the offense for which the person is convicted.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2007, ch. 375, § 1; 2012, ch. 889, § 1.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, in the definition of “violent offender”, rewrote the introductory paragraph of (A)(i) which read: “Is charged with or convicted of an offense, during the course of which offense or conduct, without regard to whether any of the circumstances described in subdivision (4)(A)(i), (4)(A)(ii), or (4)(A)(iii) is an element of the offense or conduct of which or for which the person is charged or convicted:”, and added (B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 889, § 2. May 9, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. Drug court treatment program participant facing sanctions, but not termination from program, for infractions—notice and hearing rights; recusal of judge. OAG 11-10, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/18/11).

16-22-104. General principles.

All drug court treatment programs in this state shall be established and operate according to the following general principles as established by the National Association of Drug Court Professionals, Drug Court Standards Committee:

Drug courts integrate alcohol and other drug treatment services with justice system case processing;

Drug courts use a nonadversarial approach, with prosecution and defense counsel promoting public safety while protecting participants' due process rights;

Drug courts identify eligible participants early and promptly place them in the drug court treatment program;

Drug courts provide access to a continuum of alcohol, drug, mental health and other related treatment and rehabilitation services;

Drug courts monitor abstinence by frequent alcohol and other drug testing;

Drug courts use a coordinated strategy to govern responses to participants' compliance;

Drug courts use ongoing judicial interaction with each drug court participant as an essential component of the program;

Drug courts utilize monitoring and evaluation to measure the achievement of program goals and gauge effectiveness;

Drug courts employ continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective drug court planning, implementation and operations; and

Drug courts forge partnerships among the courts, public agencies and community-based organizations to generate local support and enhance drug court effectiveness.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2010, ch. 833, § 1.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment inserted “, mental health” in (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 833, § 3. April 27, 2010.

Attorney General Opinions. The judge, prosecutor and public defender should be personally immune from money damages for allegedly wrongful acts or omissions arising from their participation in cases in drug court, OAG 05-138 (9/8/05).

Drug court treatment program participant facing sanctions, but not termination from program, for infractions—notice and hearing rights; recusal of judge. OAG 11-10, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/18/11).

Cited: State v. Stewart, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 691 (Tenn. Crim. App. Aug. 18, 2010).

16-22-105. Administration.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall administer the drug court treatment program by:

Defining, developing, and gathering outcome measures for drug court treatment programs relating to § 16-22-102;

Collecting, reporting and disseminating drug court treatment data;

Supporting a state drug treatment mentor program;

Sponsoring and coordinating state drug court treatment training;

Awarding, administering and evaluating state drug court treatment grants; and

Developing standards of operation for drug court treatment programs.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2007, ch. 375, § 2; 2015, ch. 453, § 11.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “department of finance and administration, office of criminal justice programs”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-22-106. Application for grant funds.

Through the department of mental health and substance abuse services, a court exercising criminal jurisdiction within this state or an existing drug court treatment program created by a court exercising criminal jurisdiction may apply for drug court treatment program grant funds to:

Fund a full-time or part-time program director position;

Fund drug court treatment staff whose job duties are directly related to program operations;

Fund substance abuse treatment, mental health and other direct services for drug court treatment participants;

Fund drug testing;

Fund program costs directly related to program operations; and

Implement or continue drug court treatment program operations.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2007, ch. 375, § 3; 2010, ch. 833, § 2; 2015, ch. 453, § 12.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment inserted “, mental health” in (3).

The 2015 amendment substituted “department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “office of criminal justice programs”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 833, § 3. April 27, 2010.

Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-22-107. Prohibited use of grant awards.

Department of mental health and substance abuse services grant awards may not be:

Used to pay for wages not directly related to drug court treatment program operations;

Made to any court that does not agree to operate its program in accordance with the principles in § 16-22-104;

Used for construction or land acquisition;

Used to pay bonuses or commissions to any individuals or organizations; or

Used to form a corporation.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2015, ch. 453, § 13.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “office of criminal justice programs”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-22-108. Establishment of advisory committee.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall establish an advisory committee composed of seven (7) members, two (2) of whom shall be judges who have presided over a drug court for at least two (2) years and two (2) of whom shall be drug coordinators who have functioned as drug coordinators in actively implemented drug courts for at least two (2) years. The committee shall review all program criteria established by the department of mental health and substance abuse services and shall advise the commissioner on the allocation of funds under this chapter. Before appointing the members, the commissioner shall consult with the president of the Tennessee Association of Drug Court Professionals, the president of the Tennessee Association of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Services and the Tennessee Association of Mental Health Organizations. After the commissioner establishes staggered terms with the initial appointments, a member shall have a four-year term, and a member may be appointed to serve one (1) additional consecutive term. Each member shall be reimbursed from the drug court treatment program resources fund established in § 16-22-110 for travel expenses for attending a meeting of the advisory committee in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2008, ch. 883, § 1; 2015, ch. 453, § 14.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “department of mental health and substance abuse services” for “office of criminal justice programs”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-22-109. Collection and assessment of fees

The clerks of all courts of general sessions, circuit and criminal courts and municipal courts exercising the jurisdiction of courts of general sessions shall collect the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), or in counties establishing or operating a veterans treatment court in accordance with § 16-6-104, one hundred thirty dollars ($130), from any person who:

Enters a plea of guilty;

Enters a plea of nolo contendere;

Is adjudicated at trial;

Enters a plea pursuant to any of the diversionary sentencing statutes to any criminal offense described in subsection (b), for attempt or conspiracy to commit any such offense or for aiding, abetting or acting in the capacity of an accessory in the commission of any such offense; or

Is found in violation of the terms and conditions of a suspended sentence imposed for any criminal offense described in subsection (b).

The fee established in subsection (a) applies to any offense under the Tennessee Drug Control Act, compiled in title 39, chapter 17, part 4.

The clerks of all courts of general sessions, circuit and criminal courts and municipal courts exercising the jurisdiction of courts of general sessions shall collect the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), or in counties establishing or operating a veterans treatment court in accordance with § 16-6-104, one hundred thirty dollars ($130), from any person who is found in violation of the terms and conditions of a suspended sentence imposed for any criminal conviction in which the violation is premised upon a positive drug screen.

Except as provided in subsection (e), this assessment shall be subject to § 8-21-401 and shall be in addition to all other taxes, costs and fines. The first five dollars ($5.00) of each such assessment shall be paid to the clerks of the court imposing assessment, who shall transfer it to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the general fund and earmark it for use by the department of finance and administration, office of criminal justice programs, for funding drug court treatment program administration and funding such grant awards as are made by the department of finance and administration, office of criminal justice programs. The remainder of the assessments shall be deposited by the clerk of the collecting court into a dedicated county fund. The fund shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of the fiscal year, but shall remain for the purposes set out in this section. The money shall be used by the county exclusively for the creation and maintenance of state drug court treatment programs as defined in § 16-22-104. In the event no drug court treatment program operates in a county, the remainder of the funds from that county shall be remitted annually in full to the state of Tennessee to be placed in the drug court treatment program resources fund to be administered by the department of finance and administration, office of the criminal justice programs, in accordance with § 16-22-110. The comptroller's regular audit of a local government shall also include the dedicated county fund established by this section.

For counties establishing or operating a veterans treatment court program in accordance with § 16-6-104:

This assessment shall be subject to § 8-21-401 and shall be in addition to all other taxes, costs, and fines;

The first ten dollars ($10.00) of each such assessment shall be paid to the clerks of the court imposing the assessment, who shall transfer it to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the general fund and earmark it for use by the department of mental health and substance abuse services for funding drug court treatment program and veterans treatment court program administration;

The revenue generated by seventy dollars ($70.00) of each such assessment shall be deposited by the clerk of the collecting court into a dedicated county fund and used by the county exclusively for the creation and maintenance of state drug court treatment programs as defined in § 16-22-104; provided, that this fund shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of the fiscal year, but shall remain for the purposes set out in this subdivision (e)(3). In the event no drug court treatment program operates in a county, the remainder of the funds from that county shall be remitted annually in full to the state to be placed in the drug court treatment program resources fund to be administered by the department of mental health and substance abuse services, in accordance with § 16-22-110;

The remaining fifty dollars ($50.00) of each such assessment shall be deposited by the clerk of the collecting court into a dedicated county fund and used by the county exclusively for the operation and maintenance of veterans treatment court programs in the county; provided, that this fund shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of the fiscal year, but shall remain for the purposes set out in this subdivision (e)(4). In the event no veterans treatment court program operates in a county, the remainder of the funds from that county shall be remitted annually in full to the state, deposited in a separate account in the general fund, and designated for the exclusive use of the department of mental health and substance abuse services to assist existing veterans treatment court programs and to create and establish veterans treatment court programs in areas of this state that have a significant veteran population involved in the criminal justice system. The department is not required to distribute money to any county that operates or establishes a veterans treatment court program that does not operate according to the ten (10) key components or, for which program, the judge or other court professionals have not completed nationally recognized training and state certification as established by the department;

The comptroller's regular audit of a local government shall also include the dedicated county funds established by this section; and

As used in this subsection (e), “veterans treatment court program” has the same meaning as defined in § 16-6-101.

The funds collected from this assessment are dedicated to the administration and operation of drug court treatment programs created by courts exercising criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2005, ch. 429, § 2; 2007, ch. 375, §§ 4-6; 2015, ch. 453, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Criminal Justice Veterans Compensation Act of 2015” or the “CJVC Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the establishment of specialized veterans treatment courts, see Acts 2015, ch. 453.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “seventy-five dollars ($75.00), or in counties establishing or operating a veterans treatment court in accordance with § 16-6-104, one hundred thirty dollars ($130),” for “seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” in (a) and (c); substituted “Except as provided in subsection (e), this assessment” for “This assessment” in (d); added (e) and redesignated existing (e) as (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 453, § 15. July 1, 2015.

16-22-110. Administration and disbursement of fees.

The assessment collected and remitted to the state shall be placed in a drug court treatment program resources fund for the purposes of funding drug court treatment program administration and the grant awards as provided in §§ 16-22-105 and 16-22-106. The office of criminal justice programs shall administer the money in the drug court treatment program resources fund. Any unspent money shall not be transferred or placed to the credit of the general revenue fund of the state at the end of each year, but shall remain deposited to the credit of the drug court treatment program resources fund for future allocation.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1.

16-22-111. No right to treatment conferred.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall confer a right or an expectation of a right to treatment for an offender within the criminal justice system.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1.

16-22-112. Construction.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of any jurisdiction to create or maintain a drug court treatment program that adheres to the guidelines set forth in § 16-22-104.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1.

16-22-113. Treatment program participants.

Each participant in a drug court treatment program shall:

Not be a violent offender as defined in § 16-22-103;

Be substance abusing or chemically dependent, or both; and

Be willing to participate in a treatment program.

Acts 2003, ch. 335, § 1; 2007, ch. 375, § 7.

16-22-114. Juvenile court drug court treatment programs.

In addition to courts exercising criminal jurisdiction and authorized to serve as drug treatment courts, courts exercising jurisdiction over juveniles alleged to be delinquent or unruly may also develop and operate drug court treatment programs, subject to all guidelines and requirements in this chapter. The juvenile drug court treatment programs shall not be funded or supported by revenues collected by the clerks of general sessions, circuit and criminal courts or municipal courts exercising general sessions court jurisdiction pursuant to § 16-22-109.

Acts 2007, ch. 375, § 8.